Mississippi statutes. Title 25. Public Officers and Employees; Public Records
Article 9. Feasibility Study of Establishing Separate Retirement Plan for Volunteer Fire Fighters.

§ 25-11-351.
Feasibility study of establishing separate retirement plan for volunteer fire fighters; expenses of study.

The Public Employees’ Retirement System of Mississippi shall conduct a study of the feasibility of establishing a separate and distinct retirement plan for the actively participating volunteer fire fighters of this state serving with any fire department in the State of Mississippi. This study shall determine the approximate number of potential covered participants, a schedule of proposed benefits, proposed administrative processes, and a funding method with actuarial data in support thereof.

All expenses of the Public Employees’ Retirement System of Mississippi in conducting the study shall be paid from its current budget. However, if the study demonstrates the viability of such a plan and such a plan is established, then the Public Employees’ Retirement System of Mississippi may recover all expenses actually made in conducting the study from the retirement plan established as a result thereof.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1990, ch. 467, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1990.